Maine, session 132, LD761.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Fiscal year 2024-25 year-end unappropriated surplus; next priority
transfer. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, at the close of the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2025, as the next priority after the transfers authorized pursuant to the
Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, sections 1507 and 1511, the transfer of $2,500,000 for the
Reserve for General Fund Operating Capital pursuant to Title 5, section 1536 and the
transfers to the Retiree Health Insurance Internal Service Fund pursuant to Title 5, section
1519 and after all required deductions of appropriations, budgeted financial commitments
and adjustments considered necessary by the State Controller have been made and after all
other transfers from the available balance of the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund
provided for in any other provision of law, the State Controller shall transfer from the
available balance of the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund up to $18,000,000 to
the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, Parks - General Operations
program, Other Special Revenue Funds account to be used for the ongoing maintenance,
preservation and promotion of historic sites.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.